Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.820

Baccalaureate degree programs—Agreements with state universities, regional universities, or the state college.

(1) One strategy to accomplish expansion of baccalaureate capacity in underserved regions of the state is to allocate state funds for student enrollment to a community and technical college and authorize the college to enter into agreements with a state university, regional university, or state college as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, to offer baccalaureate degree programs.

(2) Subject to legislative appropriation for the purpose described in this section, the college board shall select and allocate funds to three community or technical colleges for the purpose of entering into an agreement with one or more state universities, regional universities, or the state college to offer baccalaureate degree programs on the college campus.

(3) The college board shall select the community or technical college based on analysis of gaps in service delivery, capacity, and student and employer demand for programs. Before taking effect, the agreement under this section must be approved by the student achievement council.

(4) Students enrolled in programs under this section are considered students of the state university, regional university, or state college for all purposes including tuition and reporting of state-funded enrollments.

[ 2017 c 52 s 11; 2012 c 229 s 538; 2005 c 258 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Findings—Intent—2005 c 258: See note following RCW 28B.45.014.